New York, session 2025-2026, A9577.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (d-3) of subdivision 3 of section 364-j of the 2 social services law, as amended by section 1 of part HH of chapter 57 of 3 the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 (d-3) Services provided in school-based health centers shall not be 5 provided to medical assistance recipients through managed care programs 6 established pursuant to this section [until at least April first, two 7 thousand twenty-six]. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 9 the amendments to section 364-j of the social services law made by this 10 act shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed 11 repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00465-02-5